Washington statutes.
RCW 11.80.060

Removal or resignation of trustee—Final account.

The court shall have the power to remove or to accept the resignation of such trustee and appoint another in his or her stead. At the termination of his or her trust, as hereinafter provided or in case of his or her resignation or removal, the trustee shall file a final account, which account shall be settled in the manner provided by law for settling the final accounts of personal representatives.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2081; 1965 c 145 s 11.80.060. Prior: 1915 c 39 s 5; RRS s 1715-5.]